District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.26

Repealed

Meetings of shareholders — Notice.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 190, ch. 269, § 26
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 6
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 240, Pub. L. 86-106, § 5
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.26.
1981 Ed., § 29-326.
1973 Ed., § 29-910a.